Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-172
Militia; action or proceeding against member on active service; service of copy on Adjutant General; procedure.

Any person bringing an action or proceeding against any member of the military forces of the State of Nebraska for any act done when in the active service of the state shall serve upon the Adjutant General a copy of any pleading, complaint, or information and the Adjutant General shall be entitled to be heard in such action or proceeding.

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 70, p. 1604.